District of Columbia statutes.
1-1021.02

Issuance of rules and regulations.

The Board of Elections and Ethics shall issue rules and regulations to effect the provisions of this act, in accordance with the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act (§ 2-501 et seq.).

June 7, 1979, D.C. Law 3-1, § 8, 25 DCR 9454
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-88, § 7, 29 DCR 458
“This act,” referenced in this section is the Initiative, Referendum and Recall Procedures Act of 1979, effective June 7, 1979, D.C. Law 3-1.
1973 Ed., § 1-1119.1.
1981 Ed., § 1-1324.